District of Columbia statutes.
46-220

Payments by employer where employee has no salary or salary inadequate for services rendered.

Where the obligor claims to be rendering services without salary or compensation, or at a salary or compensation so inadequate as to satisfy the Court that the salary or compensation is merely colorable and designed to defraud or impede withholding, the Court may direct the employer to make payments to satisfy the withholding in installments, based upon a reasonable value of the services rendered by the obligor under this employment or upon the obligor’s current earnings ability.

History

Feb. 24, 1987, D.C. Law 6-166, § 21, 33 DCR 6710
May 12, 2006, D.C. Law 16-100, § 3(t), 53 DCR 1886

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 30-520.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 16-100 substituted “satisfy the withholding” for “satisfy the withholding order”.

Temporary Amendment of Section

Section 3(u) of D.C. Law 16-42 deleted “order” following “satisfy the withholding”.
Section 5(b) of D.C. Law 16-42 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3(u) of Income Withholding Transfer and Revision Emergency Amendment Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-167, July 26, 2005, 52 DCR 7648).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3(u) of Income Withholding Transfer and Revision Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-200, November 17, 2005, 52 DCR 10490).